Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2406
Certificate; denial or revocation; appeal; filing fee.

Any person who is denied a certificate, whose certificate is revoked, or who has not been issued a certificate upon expiration of the three-day period may appeal within ten days of receipt of the denial or revocation to the county court of the county of the applicant's place of residence. The applicant shall file with the court the specific reasons for the denial or revocation by the chief of police or sheriff and a filing fee of ten dollars in lieu of any other filing fee required by law. The court shall issue its decision within thirty days of the filing of the appeal.

Laws 1991, LB 355, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 1227, § 4.